sv: Kopplingstyp mellan foliemast och flygkropp: Fastbultad; Laxstjärt; Integrerad; Snabbkoppling; Glidskena; Övrigt
en: Foil mast fuselage connection type: Bolt-on; Dovetail; Integrated; Quick connect; Sliding track; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta spajanja trupa s folijskim jarbolom: Na vijke; Lastin rep; Integrirano; Brzi spoj; Klizna tračnica; Ostalo
es: Tipo de conexión del fuselaje del mástil del hidrofoil: Atornillado; Cola de milano; Integrado; Conexión rápida; Riel deslizante; Otro
ja: フォイルマスト胴体連携タイプ: ボルトオン; ダブテール; 一体型; クイックコネクト; スライディングトラック; その他
nb: Folie mast flykropp forbindelse type: Skrudd; Svalehale; Integrert; Hurtigkobling; Glideskinne; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão da fuselagem do mastro do foil: Parafusado; Rabo de andorinha (Dovetail); Integrado; Conexão rápida; Trilho deslizante; Outro
bg-BG: Тип връзка между мачтата и фюзелажа на хидрофойла: С болтове; Лястовича опашка; Интегрирана; Бърза връзка; Плъзгаща се релса; Друга
nl: Foilmast fuselage-verbindingstype: Bolt-on; Zwaluwstaart; Geïntegreerd; Snelkoppeling; Glijrail; Overige
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης ιστού και ατράκτου του foil: Βιδωτή; Χελιδονοουρά; Ενσωματωμένη; Ταχυσύνδεσμος; Συρόμενη ράγα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Folija jambor tipa povezava trupa: Pritrditev z vijaki; Lastovičji rep; Integrirano; Hitri priključek; Drsna tirnica; Drugo
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อเสาฟอยล์กับส่วนนอก: ขันน็อต; หางเหยี่ยว; ในตัว; ข้อต่อสวมเร็ว; รางเลื่อน; อื่นๆ
da: Type af forbindelse mellem foilmast og fuselage: Bolt-on; Svalehale; Integreret; Quick-connect; Glideskinne; Andet
lt-LT: Foilo stiebo ir fiuzeliažo jungties tipas: Prisukama varžtais; „Kregždės uodegos“ jungtis; Integruota; Greitojo sujungimo; Slankusis bėgelis; Kita
de: Verbindungsart zwischen Foilmast und Fuselage: Angeschraubt; Schwalbenschwanz; Integriert; Schnellverbindung; Gleitschiene; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 水翼桅杆與機身連接類型: 螺栓固定; 鳩尾槽; 一體成型; 快速連接; 滑軌; 其他
ru: Тип соединения мачты фойла с фюзеляжем: На болтах; Ласточкин хвост; Интегрированное; Быстросъемное; Скользящая направляющая; Другое
ro-RO: Tipul de conexiune dintre catarg și fuzelajul pentru folie: Cu șurub; Coadă de rândunică; Integrat; Conectare rapidă; Șină glisantă; Altele
sk-SK: Typ spojenia medzi trupom a sťažňom foilu: Skrutkované; Rybinový spoj; Integrované; Rýchlospojka; Posuvná koľajnička; Iné
cs: Fóliový stěžeň trupu propojení typu: Šroubovací; Rybinový; Integrovaný; Rychlospojka; Posuvná kolejnice; Ostatní
it: Tipo di relazione fusoliera albero foil: Avvitato; A coda di rondine; Integrato; A collegamento rapido; Binario scorrevole; Altro
zh-CN: 箔材桅杆机身连接类型: 螺栓连接; 燕尾槽连接; 一体式; 快速连接; 滑动轨道; 其他
tr: Folyo direk gövdesi bağlantı tipi: Cıvatalı; Kırlangıç kuyruğu; Entegre; Hızlı bağlantı; Kayar kızak; Diğer
fi: Kantosiipimaston rungon liitäntätyyppi: Pultattava; Lohpyrstö; Integroitu; Pikaliitin; Liukukisko; Muu
fr: Type de liaison entre le mât et le fuselage du foil: Boulonné; En queue d’aronde; Intégré; Connexion rapide; Rail coulissant; Autre
vi: Loại kết nối thân máy bay với cột lá kim loại: Gắn bu-lông; Đuôi én; Tích hợp; Kết nối nhanh; Rãnh trượt; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação da fuselagem do mastro da folha: Aparafusado; Rabo de andorinha; Integrado; Ligação rápida; Calha deslizante; Outro
pl: Typ połączenia masztu foil z kadłubem: Przykręcany; Dovetail / Jaskółczy ogon; Zintegrowany; Szybkozłącze; Szyna przesuwna; Inny
hu: Foil árboc törzs csatlakozás típusa: Csavarozható; Fecskefarkú; Integrált; Gyorscsatlakozós; Csúszósínes; Egyéb
ko: 포일 마스트 동체 연결 방식: 볼트온; 도브테일; 일체형; 퀵 커넥트; 슬라이딩 트랙; 기타